src/fst/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON PROP_10VIDRIK-PL
:%{back%}     NMN_10VIDRIK-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_10AABITS !!= @CODE@ aabits:aabits
!:%^WGStem%>a PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10AABITS-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10AABITS-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_10AABITS-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_10AABITS-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_10AABITS-PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_10AABITS-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_10HEERITS !!= @CODE@ heerits:heerits
!:%^WGStem%>a PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10HEERITS-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10HEERITS-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_10HEERITS-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_10HEERITS-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_10HEERITS-PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_10HEERITS-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_10AADRWS1 !!= @CODE@ aadrõś:aadrõs
!:%>i PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10AADRWS1-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10AADRWS1-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_10AADRWS1-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_10AADRWS1-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_10AADRWS1-PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_10AADRWS1-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_10HUEPAETS1 !!= @CODE@ hüpätś:hüpätś
!:%^WGStem%>i PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10HUEPAETS1-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_10HUEPAETS1-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_10HUEPAETS1-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_10HUEPAETS1-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_10HUEPAETS1-PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_10HUEPAETS1-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_10HERESK1 !!= @CODE@ heresḱ:heresḱ
!:%^WGStem%>i PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10HERESK1-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_10HERESK1-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_10HERESK1-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_10HERESK1-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_10HERESK1-PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_10HERESK1-PL ;


!LEXICON PROP_11LAETEQ !!= @CODE@ läteq:lätte
!: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_11LAETEQ-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_11LAETEQ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_11LAETEQ-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_11ANNWQ/LAETEQ-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_11LAETEQ-PL
!:%{front%} NMN_11ANNWQ/LAETEQ-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_11AINWQ !!= @CODE@ ainõq:ainõ
! PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_11AINWQ-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_11AINWQ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_11AINWQ-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_11AINWQ/KELMEQ-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_11AINWQ-PL
!:%{back%} NMN_11AINWQ/KELMEQ-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_12REPAEN1
!:%^Pen%^WGStem%>se PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_12REPAEN1-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_12REPAEN1-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_12REPAEN1-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_12REPAEN1-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_12REPAEN1-PL
!:%{front%} NMN_12REPAEN1-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_12HOPWN1
!:%^Pen%^WGStem%>sõ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_12HOPWN1-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_12HOPWN1-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_12HOPWN1-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_12HOPWN1-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_12HOPWN1-PL
!:%{back%} NMN_12HOPWN1-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_12SUEKUES
!:%^Pen%^WGStem%>e PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_12SUEKUES-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_12SUEKUES-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_12SUEKUES-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_12SUEKUES-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_12SUEKUES-PL
!:%{front%} NMN_12SUEKUES-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_12NWKWS1
!:%^Pen%^WGStem%>õ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_12NWKWS1-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_12NWKWS1-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_12NWKWS1-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_12NWKWS1-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_12NWKWS1-PL
!:%{back%} NMN_12NWKWS1-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_13ALONW !!= @CODE@ alonõ:alo
!! Gradation: No
!:%>dsõ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_13ALONW-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_13ALONW-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_13ALONW-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_13ALONW/TAEHINE-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_13ALONW-PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_13ALONW/TAEHINE-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_13TAEHINE !!= @CODE@ tähine:tähi
!! Gradation: No
!:%>dse PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_13TAEHINE-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_13TAEHINE-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_13TAEHINE-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_13ALONW/TAEHINE-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_13TAEHINE-PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_13ALONW/TAEHINE-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_14RITS1KAS !!= @CODE@ ritśkas:ritśka, saabas:saapa
!! Gradation: No
!: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_14RITS1KAS-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_14RITS1KAS-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_14RITS1KAS-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_14RITS1KAS/HERNEH-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_14RITS1KAS-PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_14RITS1KAS/HERNEH-PL ;!


LEXICON PROP_14HAMMAS !!= @CODE@ hammas:hamba, saabas:saapa
!! gradation: yes
!! distinguished from 14RITS1KAS due to gradation
: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_14HAMMAS-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_14HAMMAS-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_14HAMMAS-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_14HAMMAS/IKAES-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_14HAMMAS-PL
:%{back%}     NMN_14HAMMAS/IKAES-PL ;


!LEXICON PROP_PEREH !!= @CODE@ pereh:pereh
! vowel_harmony: front
! gradation: yes
!! distinguished from 14RITS1KAS due to word final h
!: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_PEREH-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_PEREH-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_PEREH-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_PEREH-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_PEREH-PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_PEREH-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_HAMWH !!= @CODE@ hamõh:hamõh
! vowel_harmony: back
! gradation: yes
!! distinguished from 14RITS1KAS due to word final h
!: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_HAMWH-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_HAMWH-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_HAMWH-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_HAMWH-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_HAMWH-PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_HAMWH-PL ;


LEXICON PROP_15KOTUS
!! kotus:kotus
!! * Yaml: **N-kotus15**
:õ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_15KOTUS-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_15KOTUS-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_15KOTUS-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_15KOTUS/ILVES-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_15KOTUS-PL
:%{back%}     NMN_15KOTUS/ILVES-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_15ILVES
!! kotus:kotus
!! * Yaml: **N-kotus15**
:õ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_15ILVES-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_15ILVES-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_15ILVES-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_15KOTUS/ILVES-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_15ILVES-PL
:%{front%}     NMN_15KOTUS/ILVES-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_15JOHANNES
!! kotus:kotus
!! * Yaml: **N-kotus15**
:%{eõ%} PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth:e PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_15JOHANNES-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@        PROP_15JOHANNES-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_15JOHANNES-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_15JOHANNES-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_15JOHANNES-PL
:%{back%}     NMN_15JOHANNES-PL ;


!LEXICON PROP_16INEMINE !!= @CODE@
!!! inemine:inemi
!! Gradation: No
!!! * Yaml: __N-inemine16__
!:%>se PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_16INEMINE-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_16INEMINE-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_16INEMINE-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_16ABILINW/INEMINE-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_16INEMINE-PL
!:%{front%} NMN_16ABILINW/INEMINE-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_16ABILINW !!= @CODE@
!! abilinõ:abili
! Gradation: No
!! * Yaml: **N-abilinw16**
:%>sõ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_16ABILINW-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_16ABILINW-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_16ABILINW-SG
:%{back%} NMN_16ABILINW/INEMINE-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_16ABILINW-PL
:%{back%} NMN_16ABILINW/INEMINE-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_18AIVASTUS
:%>õ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_18AIVASTUS-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_18AIVASTUS-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_18AIVASTUS-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_18AIVASTUS/EHITUES-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_18AIVASTUS-PL
:%{back%}     NMN_18AIVASTUS/EHITUES-PL ;


LEXICON PROP_18EHITUES
:%>e PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_18EHITUES-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_18EHITUES-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_18EHITUES-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_18AIVASTUS/EHITUES-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_18EHITUES-PL
:%{front%}     NMN_18AIVASTUS/EHITUES-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_19ALOMANW !!= @CODE@ alomanõ:aloma
! Gradation: No
!:%>dsõ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_19ALOMANW-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_19ALOMANW-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_19ALOMANW-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_19ALOMANW/PEDAEJAENE-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_19ALOMANW-PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_19ALOMANW/PEDAEJAENE-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_19PEDAEJAENE !!= @CODE@ pedäjäne:pedäjä
! Gradation: No
!:%>dse PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_19PEDAEJAENE-SG ;
! PROP_19PEDAEJAENE-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_19PEDAEJAENE-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_19ALOMANW/PEDAEJAENE-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_19PEDAEJAENE-PL
!:%{front%} NMN_19ALOMANW/PEDAEJAENE-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_20VAEITS1
!:%>e PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_20VAEITS1-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_20VAEITS1-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_20VAEITS1-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_20VAEITS1-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_20VAEITS1-PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_20VAEITS1-PL ;


!LEXICON PROP_21HUEDSI !!= @CODE@ hüdsi:hüdsi
!:%^VowRM%>e PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_21HUEDSI-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_21HUEDSI-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_21HUEDSI-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_21HUEDSI-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_21HUEDSI-PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_21HUEDSI-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_22VWROKWNW !!= @CODE@ võrokõnõ:võrokõ
! Gradation: No
!:%>sõ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_22VWROKWNW-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_22VWROKWNW-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_22VWROKWNW-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_22VWROKWNW/VAEHAEKENE-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_22VWROKWNW-PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_22VWROKWNW/VAEHAEKENE-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_22VAEHAEKENE !!= @CODE@ vähäkene:vähäke
!! Gradation: No
!:%>se PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_22VAEHAEKENE-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_22VAEHAEKENE-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_22VAEHAEKENE-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_22VWROKWNW/VAEHAEKENE-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_22VAEHAEKENE-PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_22VWROKWNW/VAEHAEKENE-PL ;


!LEXICON PROP_23NUUL1 !!= * @CODE@ nuuĺ:nool
!! Gradation: No
!:%>õ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_23NUUL1-SG ;
! PROP_23NUUL1-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_23NUUL1-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_23NUUL1/KIIL1-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_23NUUL1-PL
!:%{back%} NMN_23NUUL1/KIIL1-PL ;


!LEXICON PROP_23KIIL1  !!= * @CODE@ kiiĺ:keel
!! Gradation: No
!:%>e PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_23KIIL1-SG ;
! PROP_23KIIL1-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_23KIIL1-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_23NUUL1/KIIL1-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_23KIIL1-PL
!:%{front%} NMN_23NUUL1/KIIL1-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_24KAESI
!! gradation: yes
!! vowel_harmony: front
!:e%^WGStem PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_24KAESI-SG ;
! PROP_24KAESI-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_24KAESI-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_24KAESI-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_24KAESI-PL
!:%{front%} NMN_24KAESI-PL ;
!+N+Sg+Nom+WORK: K ;

!LEXICON PROP_24SUSI
!! gradation: yes
!! vowel_harmony: front
!:%^VOWLower%^WGStem%>e PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_24SUSI-SG ;
! PROP_24SUSI-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_24SUSI-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_24SUSI-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_24SUSI-PL
!:%{back%} NMN_24SUSI-PL ;
!+N+Sg+Nom+WORK: K ;

!LEXICON PROP_25SUEAE
!:%>me PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_25SUEAE-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_25SUEAE-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_25SUEAE-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_25SUEAE-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_25SUEAE-PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_25SUEAE-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_25ASWQ
!:mõ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_25ASWQ-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_25ASWQ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_25ASWQ-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_25ASWQ-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_25ASWQ-PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_25ASWQ-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_26HEPEM1
!: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ; !FIXME 2016-08-31
! PROP_26HEPEM1-SG ;
! PROP_26HEPEM1-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_26HEPEM1-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_26HEPEM1-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_26HEPEM1-PL
!:%{front%} NMN_26HEPEM1-PL ;
!+N+Sg+Nom+WORK: K ;

!LEXICON PROP_27EHEQ
!: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ; ! FIXME 2016-08-31
! PROP_27EHEQ-SG ;
! PROP_27EHEQ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_27EHEQ-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_27ASTÕQ/EHEQ-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_27EHEQ-PL
!:%{front%} NMN_27ASTÕQ/EHEQ-PL ;
!+N+Sg+Nom+WORK: K ;

!LEXICON PROP_HAPU !!= * __@CODE@__ hapu:hapu
!! gradation: yes
!:%^VowRM%>nõ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_HAPU-SG ;
! PROP_HAPU-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_HAPU-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_27HAPU-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_HAPU-PL
!:%{back%} NMN_27HAPU-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_28TUETAER1
!:%^Pen%^VowRM%>e PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_28TUETAER1-SG ;
! PROP_28TUETAER1-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_28TUETAER1-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_28TUETAER1-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_28TUETAER1-PL
!:%{front%} NMN_28TUETAER1-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_28KANNWL1
!:%^Pen%^VowRM%>õ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_28KANNWL1-SG ;
! PROP_28KANNWL1-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_28KANNWL1-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_28KANNWL1/KINNER1-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_28KANNWL1-PL
!:%{back%} NMN_28KANNWL1/KINNER1-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_28PUNDAR
!:%^Pen%^VowRM%>a PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_28PUNDAR-SG ;
! PROP_28PUNDAR-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_28PUNDAR-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_28PUNDAR/KAEMMAEL-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_28PUNDAR-PL
!:%{back%} NMN_28PUNDAR/KAEMMAEL-PL ;
